Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 7. Industrial Development Projects

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: industrial park or similar development as public use justifying condemnation of private property, 62 ALR4th 1183.

§ 15-1-701.
Definitions; vesting of powers and privileges.

As used in this article:

“Mortgage” means any security device;

“Project” means any land, building, pollution control facility or other improvement and all necessary and appurtenant real and personal properties, whether or not in existence, suitable for manufacturing, industrial, commercial or business enterprises, for health care facilities or for manufacturing, processing or assembling agricultural or agricultural-related products. “Project” may also mean an undivided interest as a tenant in common in an electrical generating facility or in pollution control facilities in connection therewith. “Project” may also mean an energy improvements program;

“Property” means real or personal property, or any interest in property, including any undivided interest as a tenant in common in an electrical generating facility or in pollution control facilities in connection therewith;

“Energy improvements program” means a program authorizing energy efficiency or renewable energy improvements in a program adopted by a municipality, county or joint powers board.

In order to facilitate and promote the local health and general welfare, the sound economic growth of the state of Wyoming, the development of its natural resources, the protection of its natural environment, the expansion of agricultural and agricultural-related industries, the provision of health care services, energy improvements and to promote employment opportunities for the citizens of Wyoming by creating or encouraging the expansion of manufacturing, industrial plants, processing facilities and all kinds of business, which contribute payrolls and tax base to the state of Wyoming, and by attracting to and encouraging the location or the expansion within this state of such plants, facilities and businesses, all of which are hereby declared to be and constitute public purposes, the counties and municipalities of the state of Wyoming are vested with the powers and privileges hereafter set forth in this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 92; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-92; Laws 1967, ch. 95, § 1; 1973, ch. 17, § 1; 1976, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-801

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1982, ch. 33, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2011, ch. 152, § 1; 2022 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), deleted “having received an approved state certificate of need for said project in accordance with W.S.

35-2-201

through 35-2-214” following “enterprises or for health care facilities,” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(ii), added the present last sentence; added (a)(iv); and in (b), added “energy improvements.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(ii), added “or for manufacturing, processing or assembling agricultural or agricultural-related products,” made related changes; added “the expansion of agricultural and agricultural-related industries, the” in (b); and made stylistic changes.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Industrial development projects provisions held constitutional. —

See Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. City of Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967).

Quoted

in

Foster's Inc. v. City of Laramie, 718 P.2d 868,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 541

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Kautza v. City of Cody, 812 P.2d 143,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1991).

§
15-1-702.
Powers of municipalities and counties; limitations.

In addition to all other powers each municipality, county, and multi-county joint powers board has without any other authority the power to:

Acquire one (1) or more projects located within the territorial limits of the municipality or within the territorial limits of the county wherein the municipality is situated, if acquired by a municipality, or located within the county, if acquired by a county, or located within multiple counties if acquired by a joint powers board formed under W.S.

16-1-101

et seq.;

Lease any or all of its projects upon terms and conditions fixed by the governing body and consistent with the provisions of this article;

Issue revenue bonds to defray the cost of acquiring or improving any project and secure the payment of the bonds as provided in this article. Revenue bonds may be issued in two (2) or more series or issues, if necessary, and each series or issue may contain different maturity dates, interest rates, priorities on revenues available for payment, priorities on securities available for guaranteeing payment, and other terms and conditions deemed necessary and consistent with the provisions of this article; and

Sell and convey any property acquired under paragraph (a)(i) of this section and make any order respecting that property in the best interest of the municipality or county. The governing body of the municipality or county may establish terms and conditions as appear to be in the best interest of the municipality or county, including the deferment of payment of the purchase price for not to exceed ten (10) years. If payment of the purchase price is deferred, the municipality or county, at the time of completing the sale, shall take or retain a security interest in the property sold. The security interest, by vote of the governing body, may be subordinated to an obligation incurred by the purchaser for the construction of buildings or improvements on or in connection with the property sold, but the subordination agreement shall require that in the event of default by the purchaser in the payment of the deferred sale price, the holder of the obligation to which the payment of the deferred sale price is subordinated shall pay any unpaid deferred balance. The sale or conveyance of property is subject to the terms of any lease but free and clear of any other encumbrance.

No municipality or county may operate any project referred to in this section as a business or in any manner except as the lessor or holder of a security interest, nor acquire any such project or any part thereof by condemnation.

A municipality, county or joint powers board may designate an energy improvements area and establish an energy improvements program to make loans to owners of real property within the area for cost-effective energy improvements to existing residential, commercial or industrial buildings on the property. Not less than thirty (30) days prior to the designation under this subsection, the governing body shall provide an explanation of the proposed program to any utility which distributes electricity or natural gas in the area in which the proposed program will operate. A governing body which establishes an energy improvements program may secure a loan under the program with a lien on the benefited property and enforce the lien in the same manner as provided for special assessments under W.S.

15-6-401

et seq. Additionally, the governing body may require any other security for a loan it deems reasonable and necessary. The designation may establish:

A loan application process that includes an energy audit of the building proposed to be improved and other requirements to ensure that the loan will be used for energy improvements which are cost effective and otherwise consistent with the purpose of the program;

The loan terms, including interest rates;

The application and loan fees sufficient to pay the administrative and financing costs of the program, included costs associated with loan delinquencies; and

Any requirements and conditions to ensure timely repayment of loans and fees imposed under the program.

When issued for agricultural and agricultural-related projects, a municipality, county or joint powers board shall only issue bonds under this article to an entity that:

Is headquartered in Wyoming and organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming; and

Falls within the United States small business administration small business size standards for its industry classification code, effective August 19, 2019.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 93; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-93; Laws 1967, ch. 95, § 2; 1971, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-802

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2001, ch. 136, § 1; 2011, ch. 152, § 1; 2022 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to powers of cities and towns generally, see §

15-1-103

.

As to powers and duties of counties, see §§

18-2-101

to

18-2-115

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (d).

Proceedings subject to court review. —

Proceedings under the Wyoming Industrial Development Projects Act do not require a trial-type hearing as may be involved in a contested case, nor are they governed by the proceedings applicable to rule making; but, such proceedings are reviewable, at least with respect to minimum compliance with the statutory requirements providing for the issuance of bonds, within the Administrative Procedure Act's (§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

) definition of “other agency action.” Holding's Little Am. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 670 P.2d 699,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 370

(Wyo. 1983).

Resolutions and findings should be specific. —

Where a final resolution which is adopted by a board of county commissioners states that a project complies with the public purposes and provisions set forth in the Wyoming Industrial Development Projects Act, and the determinations made in the final resolution merely recite the statutory factors to be considered, this is insufficient to permit adequate judicial review in order to determine whether or not the commissioners acted arbitrarily, capriciously, or abused their discretion. Holding's Little Am. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 670 P.2d 699,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 370

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 15-1-703.
Bonds; limitations; terms and conditions; sale; expenses; negotiability.

No bonds issued by a municipality or county under this article may be general obligations of the municipality or county. Bonds and interest coupons do not constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the municipality or county or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers. These limitations shall be stated clearly on the face of each bond.

The bonds may be executed and delivered at any time, in such form and denominations, be of such tenor, in registered or bearer form either as to principal or interest or both, payable in installments at any place and at any time not exceeding thirty (30) years from their date, bear interest at any rate, be redeemable prior to maturity with or without premium and contain any provisions not inconsistent with this section, if deemed in the best interest of the municipality or county and if provided for by the governing body at the time of authorization.

Any bonds issued under this article may be sold at public or private sale in a manner and at a time set by the governing body. The municipality or county shall pay all necessary expenses, premiums and commissions in connection with the authorization, sale and issuance of the bonds from the proceeds of the sale or from the revenues of the projects.

All bonds and interest coupons are negotiable instruments, although payable solely from a specified source.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 94; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-94; Laws 1967, ch. 95, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-803; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-704.
Bonds; sources of security and limitations; mortgage provisions and limitations.

The principal and interest on any bonds issued under this article shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues of the project for which the bonds were issued and may be secured by a mortgage covering all or any part of the project by a pledge of the lease of the project, or by other security devices deemed advantageous that do not constitute a general obligation of the municipality or county. A municipality or county shall not obligate itself except with respect to the project and the application of its revenues, and shall not incur a pecuniary liability or a charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

Any mortgage given to secure the bonds may contain any agreement and provisions customarily contained in instruments securing bonds, including provisions respecting the fixing and collection of rents for any project covered, the terms of the lease of the project, the maintenance and insurance of the project, the creation and maintenance of special funds from the revenues of the project and the rights and remedies available in the event of a default to the bondholders or to the trustee under a mortgage.

Any mortgage securing the bonds may provide that:

In the event of a default in the payment of the principal or interest or in the performance of any of the terms of the agreement or mortgage, payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver with power to charge and collect rents and to apply the revenues from the project in accordance with the agreement or mortgage;

In the event of a default in the payment or the violation of any agreement contained in the mortgage, the mortgage may be foreclosed and sold in any manner permitted by law;

Any trustee under the mortgage or the holder of any of the bonds secured thereby may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale.

No breach of any agreement specified in this section may impose any pecuniary liability upon a municipality or county or any charge upon their general credit or against their taxing powers.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 95; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-95; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-804; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-705.
Leasing; prior determinations; record; agreement required; provisions thereof.

Before leasing any project the governing body shall determine the:

Project furthers the public purpose of providing health care facilities in the state or meets the following public purposes:

Creating new or additional employment opportunities;

Expanding the tax base and increasing sales, property or other tax revenues to the municipality or county;

Maintaining and promoting a stable, balanced and diversified economy among agriculture, natural resource development, business, commerce and trade;

Promoting or developing use of agricultural, manufactured, commercial or natural resource products within or without the state.

Amount necessary to pay the principal and interest on the bonds proposed to finance the project;

Amount necessary to be paid into any reserve funds which the governing body establishes in connection with the retirement of the proposed bonds and the maintenance of the project;

Estimated cost of maintaining the project in good repair and keeping it properly insured, unless the terms under which the project is to be leased provide that the lessee shall maintain and carry all proper insurance on the project;

Manner in which the amount necessary to pay any charges negotiated as hereinafter set forth, in lieu of taxes shall be determined.

No bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of this article to acquire, construct or improve a project unless the governing body makes the determinations and findings required by paragraph (a)(i) of this section. However, in the case of bonds issued to acquire, construct or improve a pollution control facility or to acquire an undivided interest as a tenant in common in pollution control facilities and any land, building, other improvement and real or personal property necessary and appurtenant thereto, the governing body shall not be required to make the determinations and findings required by paragraph (a)(i) of this section but shall be authorized to issue bonds upon determining the project will assist in reducing, preventing, abating or eliminating pollution in the municipality or county and will facilitate and promote the protection of the natural environment of the municipality or county. The determinations and findings of the governing body shall be set forth in the record of proceedings at which the proposed bonds are authorized. Before issuing the bonds the municipality or county shall lease the project under an agreement conditioned upon completion of the project and providing for payment of such rentals as, upon the basis of the determinations and findings are sufficient to pay the:

Principal and interest on the bonds;

Any charges negotiated as hereinafter set forth, in lieu of taxes, to build up and maintain any necessary reserves; and

The costs of maintaining the project in good repair and keeping it properly insured, unless the lease obligates the lessees to pay for the maintenance and insurance of the project.

Subject to the limitations of this article, the lease or its extensions or modifications may contain other terms and conditions mutually acceptable to the parties, and notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to the sale of property owned by municipalities and counties, the lease may contain an option for the lessees to purchase the project.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 96; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-96; Laws 1967, ch. 95, § 4; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-805; Laws 1979, ch. 107, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 124, § 1; 1982, ch. 33, § 1.

Provisions cannot be compared with the Wyoming community development provisions,

§

9-7-101

et seq., because, under this article, it is absolutely clear that only the revenues of the project are responsible for payment of the revenue bonds and the tax revenues and the taxing powers of the city are not under any circumstances subjected to appropriation to satisfy the indebtedness. This article does not have the same tax implications and manipulations of public tax money which are found so openly referred to and relied upon to back up and pay off the proposed bonds as in the Wyoming Community Development Act. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Evidence of area's current economic base required to determinewhether project promotes economy. —

In order to determine that a project helps to maintain and promote “a stable, balanced and diversified economy,” as called for by subparagraph (a)(i)(C), there must be evidence concerning the area's current economic base. Evidence must be presented relating to the area's economic sectors of agriculture or natural resource development. Without such evidence, the governing body's actions must be set aside as an abuse of discretion. Holding's Little Am. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 712 P.2d 331,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 617

(Wyo. 1985).

§ 15-1-706.
Refunding bonds; general procedure; limitations.

Any municipality or county may refund at any time any bonds issued under this article and outstanding, including without limitation short-term bonds issued in anticipation of the issuance of long-term bonds, by issuing refunding bonds in an amount sufficient to refund the principal together with any unpaid interest and any necessary premiums and commissions. An issue of refunding bonds may be combined with an issue of additional revenue bonds on any project if consistent with the requirements of W.S.

15-1-705

. Any refunding may be effected whether the bonds to be refunded have matured or shall thereafter mature, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds in payment of the bonds to be refunded, or by exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded. The holders of any bonds to be refunded are not compelled without their consent to surrender their bonds for payment or exchange prior to the date on which they are by their terms subject to redemption by option or otherwise. Any refunding bonds are subject to the provisions of W.S.

15-1-703

and may be secured as provided in W.S.

15-1-704

. The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows:

To the immediate payment and retirement of the bonds being refunded; or

To the extent not required for the immediate payment of the bonds being refunded then the proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the bonds being refunded and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with refunding but provision may be made for the pledging and disposition of any surplus, including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any surplus to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series of refunding bonds. Money in any trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of bonds being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable or if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 97; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-97; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-806; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-1-707.
Use of bond proceeds for certain purposes; actual project costs.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds issued under this article shall be applied only for the purpose for which the bonds were issued. Any accrued interest and premiums received on the sale shall be applied to the payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds sold. If any portion of the proceeds is not needed for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, then the unneeded portion shall be applied to the payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds. The cost of acquiring or improving any project shall include the actual cost of:

Acquiring or improving the real estate;

Construction of all or any part of the project, including architects’ and engineers’ fees;

All expenses in connection with the authorization, sale and issuance of the bonds to finance the acquisition or improvement; and

Interest on the bonds for a reasonable time prior to construction, during construction and for not more than six (6) months after completion of construction.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 98; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-98; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-807; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-1-708.
Taxation or imposition of fee; amount; general procedure.

Notwithstanding that title to a project may be in a municipality or county, any project initiated or proceedings instituted prior to February 16, 1967, by the execution of a contract between any municipality and a lessee or proposed lessee for the acquisition of a project, are subject to taxation to the same extent, in the same manner and under the same procedures as privately owned property in similar circumstances if the projects are leased to or held by private interests on both the assessment date and the date the levy is made in any year, unless the governing body and the lessee or proposed lessee agree upon an annual fee pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section. The projects are not subject to taxation if they are not leased to or held by private interests on both the assessment date and the date the levy is made in any year. If personal property owned by a municipality or county is taxed under this section and the taxes are delinquent, levy by distress warrant for collection of the delinquent taxes may be made only on the personal property against which the taxes were levied.

Projects initiated after February 16, 1967, are exempt from ad valorem taxes, but the governing body shall negotiate with the proposed lessee an annual fee in lieu of taxes, which shall fully compensate the state, the political subdivisions and other recipients of ad valorem taxes for the share each would have received had this exemption not been authorized. The annual fee, if payable to a municipality, shall be remitted by the municipality to the county treasurer of the county wherein the project is located before January 1 of the year following the year for which the fee is collected. The county treasurer shall distribute the fee together with similar fees collected from county projects to the state, the political subdivisions and other recipients of ad valorem taxes in the same manner and proportions as the ad valorem tax revenues received by the county are distributed as by law provided.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 99; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-99; Laws 1967, ch. 95, § 5; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-808; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-709.
Advice and information.

The executive director of the Wyoming business council and the University of Wyoming shall furnish advice and information in connection with a project when requested to do so by a county or municipality.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 100; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-100; Laws 1969, ch. 94, § 24; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-809; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 301.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Wyoming business council” for “department of economic planning and development.”

§ 15-1-710.
Alternative procedures authorized; other provisions applicable; form of transaction; exceptions.

Pursuant to this section and as an alternative to the procedures set forth in W.S.

15-1-701

through

15-1-708

, a municipality or county may issue revenue bonds to defray the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving any project regardless of whether or not the municipality or county acquires any ownership interest in the project. The municipality or county may authorize the user of the project, or an agent of the user or a trustee, to disburse the proceeds of the revenue bonds to pay only those costs of the project specified in W.S.

15-1-707

and only upon the conditions that the user agrees to complete the acquisition or construction of the project and pay to the municipality or county an amount sufficient to pay, when due, the principal, interest and premium, if any, on the revenue bonds, and any other expenses incurred by the municipality or county in connection therewith. The revenue bonds are payable solely from the revenues derived from payments to the municipality or county by the user of the project. These revenues may be pledged and assigned to a trustee for the benefit of the bondholders. The revenues are not deemed to be revenues of any project.

If the project is financed pursuant to this section, the provisions of W.S.

15-1-701

through

15-1-708

apply. However, the procedures shall contemplate and authorize a transaction in the form provided in this section rather than a transaction in the form of a lease or sale of a project, except that:

The revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section are not subject to the provisions of W.S. 15-1-704(a), but shall be secured by a pledge of the agreement of the user enterprise to pay principal, interest and premium, if any, on the bonds and any and all other expenses in connection with the bonds, and may be secured by any other agreement or obligation of the user enterprise or any other person;

The governing body of the municipality or county shall make similar determinations and findings as and where required by W.S.

15-1-705

before issuing bonds under this section;

Title to or in the project may at all times remain in the user or in any other person; and

The agreement or contract of the user with the municipality or county may include provisions the municipality or county deems appropriate to effect the financing of the proposed undertaking.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 196, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-100.1; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-810; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 124, § 1.